Vermont, session 2025-2026, H800.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Single Area Agency on Aging * * *
Sec. 1. 33 V.S.A. § 6203 is amended to read:
§ 6203. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Area agency on aging” means an the organization designated by the
State to develop and implement a comprehensive and coordinated system of
services, supports, and protections for older Vermonters, family caregivers,
VT LEG #385488 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.800
2026 Page 2 of 8
and kinship caregivers within a defined planning and service area of across the
State.
* * *
(13) “State Plan on Aging” means the plan required by the Older
Americans Act that outlines the roles and responsibilities of the State and the
area agencies agency on aging in administering and carrying out the Older
Americans Act.
* * *
Sec. 2. 33 V.S.A. § 6205 is amended to read:
§ 6205. AREA AGENCIES AGENCY ON AGING; DUTIES
(a) Consistent Vermont shall have a single, statewide area agency on aging,
which, consistent with the Older Americans Act and in consultation with local
home- and community-based service providers, each area agency on aging
shall:
(1) develop and implement a comprehensive and coordinated system of
services, supports, and protections for older Vermonters, family caregivers,
and kinship caregivers within the agency’s designated service area across
Vermont, in alignment with the Vermont Action Plan for Aging Well
developed pursuant to 2020 Acts and Resolves No. 156, Sec. 3;
VT LEG #385488 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.800
2026 Page 3 of 8
(2) concentrate resources on direct services, including case
management, and target services and supports to older Vermonters with the
greatest economic and social need;
(3) perform regional needs assessments to identify existing resources
and gaps;
(4) develop an area plan with goals, objectives, and performance
measures, and a corresponding budget, and submit them to the State Unit on
Aging for approval;
(5) concentrate resources, build community partnerships, and enter into
cooperate agreements with agencies and organizations for delivery of services,
including coordinating with senior centers, Meals on Wheels programs, and
community action agencies and collaborating with Vermont’s parent-child
centers in providing supports to Vermonters who are caring for their aging
parents while raising their own children; the cooperate agreements shall
require minimal administrative costs and include a clear accounting of the use
of funds received pursuant to the Older Americans Act;
(6) coordinate services with the Agency of Human Services field offices
to utilize existing administrative infrastructure and ensure that services and
supports are available throughout the State;
(7) designate community focal points for colocation of supports and
services for older Vermonters;
VT LEG #385488 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.800
2026 Page 4 of 8
(8) notify relevant providers when applying for direct service waivers;
(9) develop and implement clear and understandable statewide
eligibility criteria for home-delivered and congregate meals, in consultation
with providers of these services, which shall include applicable funding
formulas and analyses of meal costs; and
(7)(10) conduct outreach activities to identify individuals eligible for
assistance.
(b) In addition to the duties described in subsection (a) of this section, the
area agencies agency on aging shall:
(1) promote the principles established in section 6202 of this subchapter
across the agencies’ agency’s programs and shall collaborate with stakeholders
to educate the public about the importance of each principle;
(2) promote collaboration with a network of service providers to provide
a holistic approach to improving health outcomes for older Vermonters; and
(3) use their existing area plans to facilitate awareness of aging issues,
needs, and services and to promote the system principles expressed in section
6202 of this subchapter;
(4) ensure that any marketing or fundraising materials issued by or on
behalf of the agency recognize the efforts of the direct service providers with
whom the agency contracts to deliver services; and
VT LEG #385488 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.800
2026 Page 5 of 8
(5) report annually on or before January 15 to the Commissioner of
Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living, the House Committee on Human
Services, and the Senate Committee on Health and Welfare regarding the
number of individuals who were enrolled in services and supports funded by
the agency during the previous calendar year and the number of individuals
who sought but were denied those services and supports.
* * * Conforming Revisions * * *
Sec. 3. 3 V.S.A. § 3085b is amended to read:
§ 3085b. COMMISSION ON ALZHEIMER’S DISEASE AND RELATED
DISORDERS
* * *
(b) The Commission shall be composed of 21 members: the
Commissioners of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living and of Health
or designees, the Executive Director of Blueprint for Health or designee, one
Senator chosen by the Senate Committee on Committees, one Representative
chosen by the Speaker of the House, and 16 members appointed by the
Governor. The members appointed by the Governor shall represent the
following groups and organizations: physicians; social workers; hospitals and
nursing home managers, including the administrators of the Vermont Veterans’
Home; the clergy; adult day center providers; registered nurses; residential care
home operators; family care providers; the home health agency; the legal
VT LEG #385488 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.800
2026 Page 6 of 8
profession; mental health service providers; the area agencies agency on aging;
University of Vermont’s Center on Aging; the Support and Services at Home
(SASH) program; and the Alzheimer’s Association. The members appointed
by the Governor shall have direct expertise or experience working with or
caring for individuals impacted by Alzheimer’s disease and related disorders,
expertise in clinical and medical research on Alzheimer’s disease and related
disorders, or knowledge of health systems and policies to equitably address
Alzheimer’s disease and related disorders and shall represent, to the degree
possible, the five regions of the State.
* * *
Sec. 4. 14 V.S.A. § 3091 is amended to read:
§ 3091. OFFICE OF PUBLIC GUARDIAN ESTABLISHED
* * *
(b) The Commissioner of the Department of Disabilities, Aging, and
Independent Living shall employ persons as public guardians to act as
designees of the Office and to carry out the duties of the Office of Public
Guardian. Public guardians shall be available for appointment in each of the
planning and service areas served by the area agencies on aging region of the
State.
* * *
VT LEG #385488 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.800
2026 Page 7 of 8
Sec. 5. 14 V.S.A. § 3095 is amended to read:
§ 3095. STATISTICS TO BE MAINTAINED
The Office of Public Guardian shall maintain annual statistics concerning
the public guardianship program. The statistics shall include at least the
following:
(1) The number of wards for which the Office of Public Guardian was
appointed during the year for each planning service area served by the area
agencies on aging region of the State.
* * *
Sec. 6. 33 V.S.A. § 6703 is amended to read:
§ 6703. CONTRACT FOR SERVICES
* * *
(b) The Commissioner shall not be required to enter into contracts under
this section if both of the following conditions are met:
* * *
(2) The Commissioner determines that the program is not accomplishing
its goal of protecting dual eligible individuals from improper denials of
Medicare coverage. The Commissioner shall base this determination on
information obtained from the contractors, providers of health care, the area
agencies agency on aging, and other individuals and organizations affected by
the program.
VT LEG #385488 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.800
2026 Page 8 of 8
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on October 1, 2026, and shall apply to the new
State Plan on Aging that becomes effective on that date.
VT LEG #385488 v.1